Mississippi, session 2026, SB2877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-19-99, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-99.  (1)  The Department of Revenue shall furnish the tax collector of each county a sufficient supply of license tags or plates and a sufficient supply of license receipts with which to make the collection of the taxes imposed by the provisions of this article, which such tax collectors are required to collect. The license tag receipts shall be on forms prescribed by the department.  Upon the payment of the taxes and fees required by this article, the tax collector shall issue the license receipt in the form prescribed by the department.  The department shall keep account against the tax collector for the license taxes and fees collected.  The tax collector shall keep a similar account. (2)  The tax collector shall, at the end of each month or within twenty (20) days thereafter, pay into the county road fund all privilege taxes collected by him during the preceding month upon motor vehicle privilege licenses which he is entitled to issue, less the county's commission. (3)  The tax collector shall keep a record of the information furnished by the owners of each motor vehicle registered.  The record shall be made in numerical order by tag number or decal number, whichever is appropriate.  At the end of each month, or within twenty (20) days thereafter, the tax collector shall submit to the department a copy of such record, together with the copy of each registration receipt, and shall, at the same time, remit to the department the registration fee for each license tag or decal sold by him during the preceding month.  When the tax collector shall have complied with the provisions of this section and shall have forwarded to the department, within the time specified, all reports required of him hereunder, he shall then be entitled to retain five percent (5%) of the registration fees imposed in Section 27-19-43(3)(a) and (b), to be paid into the county general fund; otherwise the county's commission shall be forfeited. The five percent (5%) shall not apply to any additional registration fee imposed above the amounts imposed in Section 27-19-43(3)(a) and (b).  The department shall keep a record from the duplicates filed by the tax collectors of all registered vehicles. (4)  Counties that use their existing computer system to communicate all data regarding vehicle title and registration transactions to the state's central computer system shall be allotted Fifty Cents (50¢) for each registration fee collected by the county and remitted to the Department of Revenue.  Such communication must successfully pass any edit features and successfully create or update title/registration records on the network system.  This amount paid to the county shall be deposited into the county general fund to be expended only for costs incurred for the purchase of equipment, software, maintenance, or other costs directly related to the title/registration network system, and for education and training. (5)  All monies remitted to the department by tax collectors as registration or tag fees from the portion of the rate imposed in Section 27-19-43(3)(a) and (b), and all monies received by the department directly as registration or tag fees from the portion of the rate imposed in Section 27-19-43(3)(a) and (b), except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, shall be paid by the department into the * * * General Fund of the State Treasury Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created in Section 27-51-105 on the first day of the month succeeding the month in which such fees are received by the department. (6)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 31-17-127, all monies remitted to the department by tax collectors as registration or tag fees from the additional rate of Five Dollars ($5.00) and all monies received by the department directly as registration or tag fees from the additional rate of Five Dollars ($5.00) shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund for the construction or reconstruction of highways designated under the highway program created under Section 65-3-97. (7)  On July 1, 2021, and on the first day of each month succeeding the month in which registration or tag fees are received by the Department of Revenue, the portion of the receipts equal to the cost of the license tags, decals and associated freight costs shall be deposited into the special fund created in Section 27-19-179. SECTION 2.  Section 27-19-56.15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.15.  (1)  (a) Beginning with any registration year commencing on or after July 1, 2012, any owner of a motor vehicle who is a resident of this state, upon complying with the motor vehicle laws relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles, and upon payment of the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law for private carriers of passengers, pickup trucks and other noncommercial motor vehicles, and upon payment of an additional annual fee in the amount of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), shall be issued a distinctive license tag that displays the emblem of any public or private university of his choice located in another state. (b)  The design of the emblems for the distinctive license tags authorized under this subsection shall be determined by agreement between the Department of Revenue and the governing authorities of public or private universities in the states where the universities are located.  Such other design characteristics and information to be contained on such distinctive license tags shall be determined by the Department of Revenue. (c)  Application for the distinctive license tag authorized under this subsection shall be made to the county tax collector on forms prescribed by the Department of Revenue.  The application and the additional fee, less Two Dollars ($2.00) to be retained by the tax collector, shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue on a monthly basis as prescribed by the department.  The portion of the additional fee retained by the tax collector shall be deposited into the county general fund. (d)  (i)  The Department of Revenue shall deposit all fees that it receives under this subsection into the State Treasury on the day received.  At the end of each month, the Department of Revenue shall certify the total fees collected under this section to the State Treasurer who, except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (d), shall distribute such collections as follows: 1.  Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of the additional fees collected from each distinctive license tag issued under this subsection shall be deposited into the * * * State General Fund Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created in Section 27-51-105. 2.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 3.  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 4.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (ii)  The Treasurer shall distribute fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags displaying the emblem of Auburn University as follows: 1.  Except as otherwise provided in this item 1, Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the Adult Education Department of the Rankin County School District for the purpose of providing funds for the Rankin County School District GED Scholarship Endowment.  However, from and after January 1, 2013, Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to Habitat for Humanity/Metro Jackson, Inc. 2.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 3.  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 4.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (iii)  The State Treasurer shall distribute fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags displaying the emblem of the University of Alabama as follows: 1.  Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the Friends of Children's Hospital. 2.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 3.  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 4.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (iv)  The State Treasurer shall distribute fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags displaying the emblem of the University of South Alabama as follows: 1.  Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Trauma Care Systems Fund established in Section 41-59-75. 2.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 3.  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 4.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (v) The State Treasurer shall distribute fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags displaying the emblem of the University of Oklahoma as follows: 1. Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to Mississippi Gulf Coast Y.M.C.A., Inc. 2. One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 3. Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 4. One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (vi)  The State Treasurer shall distribute fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags displaying the emblem of the Louisiana State University as follows: 1.  Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the Bayou Bengal Booster Club of Mississippi to be utilized by the club to make contributions to charitable organizations that are approved by the Chancellor of Louisiana State University. 2.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 3.  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 4.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (vii)  The State Treasurer shall distribute fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags displaying the emblem of the University of Memphis as follows: 1.  Twenty-two Dollars ($22.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to Baptist Memorial Hospital DeSoto. 2.  Twenty-two Dollars ($22.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the Methodist Healthcare Foundation for the Methodist Olive Branch Hospital. 3.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 4.  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 5.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (viii)  The State Treasurer shall distribute fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags displaying the emblem of Clemson University as follows: 1.  Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the Magnolia Clemson Club. 2.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 3.  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 4.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (ix)  The State Treasurer shall distribute fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags displaying the emblem of Texas A&M University as follows: 1.  Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the Aggie Scholarship Committee, Inc. 2.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 3.  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 4.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (x)  The State Treasurer shall distribute fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags displaying the emblem of Florida State University as follows: 1.  Forty-four Dollars ($44.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the Florida State University Veterans Alliance Fund. 2.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. 3.  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. 4.  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on such distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (2)  A regular license tag must be properly displayed as required by law until replaced by a distinctive license tag under this section.  The regular license tag must be surrendered to the tax collector upon issuance of the distinctive license tag under this section.  The tax collector shall issue up to two (2) license decals for each distinctive license tag issued under this section, which will expire the same month and year as the regular license tag. (3)  In the case of loss or theft of a distinctive license tag issued under this section, the owner may make application and affidavit for a replacement distinctive license tag as provided by Section 27-19-37.  The fee for a replacement distinctive license tag shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00).  The tax collector receiving such application and affidavit shall be entitled to retain and deposit into the county general fund five percent (5%) of the fee for such replacement license tag and the remainder shall be distributed in the same manner as funds from the sale of regular distinctive license tags issued under this section. (4)  In order for a distinctive license tag for a university to be issued pursuant to this section, the provisions of Section 27-19-44(3) must be satisfied for such university license tag prior to July 1, 2025. SECTION 3.  Section 27-19-56.24, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.24.  (1)  Any owner of a motor vehicle who is a resident of this state, upon payment of the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law for private carriers of passengers, pickup trucks and other noncommercial motor vehicles, and upon payment of an additional fee in the amount provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall be issued a distinctive license tag for each motor vehicle registered in his name identifying such person as a supporter of Ducks Unlimited, Inc.  The distinctive license tags so issued shall be of such color and design as the * * * State Tax Commission department, with the advice of Ducks Unlimited, Inc., may prescribe and shall consist of such letters or numbers, or both, as may be necessary to distinguish each license tag. (2)  Application for the distinctive license tags authorized by this section shall be made to the county tax collector on forms prescribed by the * * * State Tax Commission department.  The application and the additional fee imposed under subsection (3) of this section, less Two Dollars ($2.00) to be retained by the tax collector, shall be remitted to the * * * State Tax Commission department on a monthly basis as prescribed by the * * * commission department.  The portion of the additional fee retained by the tax collector shall be deposited into the county general fund. (3)  Beginning with any registration year commencing on or after July 1, 2000, any person applying for a distinctive license tag under this section shall pay an additional fee in the amount of Thirty Dollars ($30.00) for each distinctive license tag applied for under this section, which shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees. The additional fee paid shall be for a period of time to run * * * concurrent concurrently with the vehicle's established license tag year.  The additional fee is due and payable at the time the original application is made for a distinctive license tag under this section and thereafter annually at the time of renewal registration as long as the owner retains the distinctive license tag.  If the owner does not wish to retain the distinctive license tag, he must surrender it to the local county tax collector. (4)  The * * * State Tax Commission department shall deposit all fees into the State Treasury on the day collected.  At the end of each month, the * * * State Tax Commission department shall certify the total fees collected under this section to the State Treasurer who shall distribute such collections as follows: (a)  Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the Mississippi Chapter of Ducks Unlimited, Inc.  If there is no Mississippi Chapter of Ducks Unlimited, Inc., then such additional fees shall be deposited into the * * * State General Fund Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created in Section 27-51-105. (b)  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi * * * Fire Fighters Memorial Burn * * * Center Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. (c)  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. (5)  A regular license tag must be properly displayed as required by law until replaced by a distinctive license tag under this section.  The regular license tag must be surrendered to the tax collector upon issuance of the distinctive license tag under this section.  The tax collector shall issue up to two (2) license decals for each distinctive license tag issued under this section, which will expire the same month and year as the regular license tag. (6)  In the case of loss or theft of a distinctive license tag issued under this section, the owner may make application and affidavit for a replacement distinctive license tag as provided by Section 27-19-37.  The fee for a replacement distinctive license tag shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00).  The tax collector receiving such application and affidavit shall be entitled to retain and deposit into the county general fund five percent (5%) of the fee for such replacement license tag and the remainder shall be distributed in the same manner as funds from the sale of regular distinctive license tags issued under this section. SECTION 4.  Section 27-19-56.137, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.137.  (1)  Any owner of a motor vehicle, who is a resident of this state, upon complying with the motor vehicle laws relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles, and upon payment of the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law for private carriers of passengers, pickup trucks and other noncommercial motor vehicles, and upon payment of an additional annual fee in the amount provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall be issued a special license tag for each motor vehicle registered in his name identifying such person as a supporter of Rebuild the Coast.org.  The distinctive license tags so issued shall be of such color and design as the Department of Revenue, with the advice of Rebuild the Coast.org, may prescribe, and shall consist of such letters or numbers, or both, as may be necessary to distinguish each license tag. (2)  Application for the distinctive license tags authorized by this section shall be made to the county tax collector on forms prescribed by the Department of Revenue.  The application and the additional fee imposed under subsection (3) of this section, less Two Dollars ($2.00) thereof to be retained by the tax collector, shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue on a monthly basis as prescribed by the department.  The portion of the additional fee retained by the tax collector shall be deposited into the county general fund. (3)  Beginning with any registration year commencing on or after July 1, 2006, any person applying for a distinctive license tag under this section shall pay an additional fee in the amount of Thirty Dollars ($30.00) for each distinctive license tag applied for under this section, which shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees. The additional fee paid shall be for a period of time to run concurrently with the vehicle's established license tag year.  The additional fee is due and payable at the time the original application is made for a distinctive license tag under this section and thereafter annually at the time of renewal registration as long as the owner retains the distinctive license tag.  If the owner does not wish to retain the distinctive license tag, he must surrender it to the local county tax collector. (4)  The Department of Revenue shall deposit all fees into the State Treasury on the day collected. At the end of each month, the Department of Revenue shall certify to the State Treasurer the total fees collected under this section from the issuance of the distinctive license tags issued under this section.  The State Treasurer shall distribute such collections as follows: (a)  Twenty-four Dollars ($24.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be disbursed to Rebuild the Coast.org; however, when Rebuild the Coast.org is dissolved, then Twenty-four Dollars ($24.00) of such additional fees shall be deposited into the * * * State General Fund Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created in Section 27-51-105. (b)  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Burn Care Fund created pursuant to Section 7-9-70. (c)  Two Dollars ($2.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. (d)  One Dollar ($1.00) of each additional fee collected on distinctive license tags issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund created in Section 27-19-44.2. (5)  A regular license tag must be properly displayed as required by law until replaced by a distinctive license tag under this section.  The regular license tag must be surrendered to the tax collector upon issuance of the distinctive license tag under this section.  The tax collector shall issue up to two (2) license decals for each distinctive license tag issued under this section, which will expire the same month and year as the regular license tag. (6)  In the case of loss or theft of a distinctive license tag issued under this section, the owner may make application and affidavit for a replacement distinctive license tag as provided by Section 27-19-37.  The fee for a replacement distinctive license tag shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00).  The tax collector receiving such application and affidavit shall be entitled to retain and deposit into the county general fund five percent (5%) of the fee for such replacement license tag and the remainder shall be distributed proportionately in the same manner as funds from the sale of regular distinctive license tags issued under this section. SECTION 5.  Section 27-19-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-45.  (1)  Owners of motor vehicles who are residents of the State of Mississippi and who hold an unrevoked and unexpired official amateur radio station license issued by the Federal Communications Commission, upon application to the tax collector in the owner's county of legal residence accompanied by proof of ownership of such amateur radio station license, and upon payment of the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law for passenger cars, pickup trucks or other noncommercial motor vehicles, and upon payment of an additional registration or tag fee of * * * Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) Seventy-five Cents (75¢) shall be issued a special license plate upon which, in lieu of the numbers prescribed by law, shall be inscribed the official amateur call letters of such applicant as assigned by the Federal Communications Commission.  This special license plate may be used in place of the regular license tag for passenger cars, pickup trucks or other noncommercial motor vehicles. * * *  The application and the additional fee, less five percent (5%) thereof to be retained by the county tax collector, shall be remitted to the State Tax Commission on a monthly basis as prescribed by the commission.  The portion of  The additional fee shall be retained by the tax collector * * * shall to be deposited into the county general fund. * * *  The portion of the fee remitted to the Tax Commission shall be deposited into the State Treasury on the day it is received and shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the State General Fund. The Governor under like terms and provisions shall be and he is hereby authorized to exhibit on any passenger cars, pickup trucks or other noncommercial motor vehicles used by him license tag Number 1, with the county of his residence inscribed thereon.  The Lieutenant Governor is likewise authorized to use license plate Number 2, with the county of his residence appearing thereon.  All former governors, under like terms and provisions, are authorized to use license plate X-1, with the county of his residence appearing thereon, and all former lieutenant governors, under like terms and provisions, are authorized to use license plate X-2, with the county of his residence appearing thereon. When a passenger car, pickup truck or other noncommercial motor vehicle for which a special license tag has been issued is sold or traded by the owner, the special tag may be transferred to the new or other passenger car, pickup truck or other noncommercial motor vehicle which is replacing the passenger car, pickup truck or other noncommercial motor vehicle for which the license tag was originally issued, without additional charge, upon application to the county tax collector, with proof that all taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law have been paid for such replacement passenger car, pickup truck or other noncommercial motor vehicle. (2)  The * * * State Tax Commission department shall make such rules and regulations as necessary to ascertain compliance with all state license laws relating to use and operation of private passenger cars, pickup trucks or other noncommercial motor vehicles before authorizing the issuance of these tags. (3)  This section is supplemental to the motor vehicle licensing laws of the State of Mississippi, and nothing herein shall be construed as abridging or amending such laws. SECTION 6.  Section 27-19-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-47.  (1)  Any citizen of the State of Mississippi who owns a registered antique automobile may apply to the tax collector in the county of his legal residence, on forms prescribed by the Department of Revenue, for a special antique automobile plate to be displayed on such antique automobile. Upon receipt of an application for a special antique automobile plate, on a form prescribed by the department, and upon payment of the fee as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the tax collector shall issue to such applicant a special antique automobile plate on a permanent basis, and it shall bear no date, but shall bear the inscription "Antique Car-Mississippi" and, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), shall be valid without renewal as long as the automobile is in existence.  Upon request by the applicant, the special antique automobile plate also may contain not more than six (6) letters of the alphabet and/or six (6) numbers along with the inscription "Antique Car-Mississippi."  The purchaser of the special plate may choose the combination of such letters and/or numbers, but no two (2) motor vehicles shall have the same combination of letters and/or numbers.  In the event that the same combination of letters and/or numbers has been chosen by two (2) or more purchasers, the Department of Revenue shall assign a different number to each such purchaser which shall appear on the license plate following the combination of letters and/or numbers; however, this combination shall not exceed six (6) letters and/or numbers.  The combination of letters and/or numbers written across the license plate shall be sufficiently large to be easily read.  No combination of letters and/or numbers which comprise words or expressions that are considered obscene, slandering, insulting or vulgar in ordinary usage shall be permitted, with the Commissioner of Revenue having the responsibility of making this determination.  If, however, such license plate is issued in error or otherwise and is determined by the commissioner to be obscene, slanderous, insulting, vulgar or offensive, the commissioner shall notify the owner that the license plate must be surrendered and that another special antique automobile plate may be selected by him and issued at no cost.  Should the vehicle owner not desire another special antique automobile plate, the fee for such plate shall be refunded.  In the event the owner fails to surrender the license plate after receiving proper notification, the commissioner shall issue an order directing that the license plate be seized by agents of the Department of Revenue or any other duly authorized law enforcement personnel. In addition, a person issued a special antique automobile plate containing letters and/or numbers along with the inscription "Antique Car-Mississippi" must renew the plate every fifth year after the plate was originally issued or renewed, as the case may be.  This special plate shall be issued for the applicant's use only for such automobile and in the event of a transfer of title, the owner shall surrender the special plate to the tax collector. Such special antique automobile plate shall be issued in lieu of, and shall have the same legal significance as, ordinary registration plates. (2)  In lieu of the annual license tax and registration fees levied under Mississippi law, a special license tax fee shall be levied on the operation of antique automobiles.  The fee for a license shall be * * * Twenty‑five Dollars ($25.00) One Dollar and Twenty-five Cents ($1.25) and, except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section, it shall be issued on a permanent basis without renewal.  There shall be no fee levied for the renewal of a special plate containing letters and/or numbers along with the inscription "Antique Car-Mississippi." The fee * * *, less five percent (5%) thereof to be retained by the county tax collector, shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue on a monthly basis as prescribed by the department.  The portion of the additional fee shall be retained by the tax collector * * * shall to be deposited into the county general fund. * * *  The portion of the fee remitted to the Department of Revenue shall be deposited into the State Treasury on the day it is received and shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the State General Fund. (3)  For the purposes of this section, motor vehicles manufactured more than twenty-five (25) years ago shall hereafter be classified as antique automobiles and shall be exempt from all ad valorem taxes levied by both state, municipal, county and other taxing districts. (4)  A person issued a special antique automobile plate under this section and who has completed an active duty career with the Armed Forces of the United States or is a retired member of the Army National Guard, Air National Guard or the United States Reserves, and is entitled to receive a distinctive license plate or tag under Section 27-19-51, may, upon application, receive an emblem or decal developed by the Department of Revenue identifying the person with such organization. The emblem or decal shall be affixed to the special antique automobile plate. SECTION 7.  Section 27-19-47.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-47.1.  (1)  Any citizen of the State of Mississippi who owns a registered antique motorcycle may apply to the tax collector in the county of his legal residence, on forms prescribed by the Department of Revenue, for a special antique motorcycle plate to be displayed on such antique motorcycle. Upon receipt of an application for a special antique motorcycle plate, on a form prescribed by the commission, and upon payment of the fee as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the tax collector shall issue to such applicant a special antique motorcycle plate on a permanent basis, and it shall bear no date, but shall bear the inscription "Antique Motorcycle-Mississippi" and, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), shall be valid without renewal as long as the motorcycle is in existence.  Upon request by the applicant, the special antique motorcycle plate also may contain not more than four (4) letters of the alphabet and/or four (4) numbers along with the inscription "Antique Motorcycle-Mississippi."  The purchaser of the special plate may choose the combination of such letters and/or numbers, but no two (2) motorcycles shall have the same combination of letters and/or numbers.  In the event that the same combination of letters and/or numbers has been chosen by two (2) or more purchasers, the Department of Revenue shall assign a different number to each such purchaser which shall appear on the license plate following the combination of letters and/or numbers; however, this combination shall not exceed four (4) letters and/or numbers.  The combination of letters and/or numbers written across the license plate shall be sufficiently large to be easily read.  No combination of letters and/or numbers which comprise words or expressions that are considered obscene, slandering, insulting or vulgar in ordinary usage shall be permitted, with the Commissioner of Revenue having the responsibility of making this determination.  If, however, such license plate is issued in error or otherwise and is determined by the commissioner to be obscene, slanderous, insulting, vulgar or offensive, the commissioner shall notify the owner that the license plate must be surrendered and that another special antique motorcycle plate may be selected by him and issued at no cost. Should the motorcycle owner not desire another special antique motorcycle plate, the fee for such plate shall be refunded.  In the event the owner fails to surrender the license plate after receiving proper notification, the commissioner shall issue an order directing that the license plate be seized by agents of the Department of Revenue or any other duly authorized law enforcement personnel.  In addition, a person issued a special antique motorcycle plate containing letters and/or numbers along with the inscription "Antique * * * Motorcyle Motorcycle-Mississippi" must renew the plate every fifth year after the plate was originally issued or renewed, as the case may be.  This special plate shall be issued for the applicant's use only for such motorcycle and in the event of a transfer of title, the owner shall surrender the special plate to the tax collector. Such special antique motorcycle plate shall be issued in lieu of, and shall have the same legal significance as, ordinary registration plates. (2)  In lieu of the annual license tax and registration fees levied under Mississippi law, a special license tax fee shall be levied on the operation of antique motorcycles.  The fee for a license shall be * * * Twenty‑five Dollars ($25.00) One Dollar and Twenty-five Cents ($1.25) and, except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section, it shall be issued on a permanent basis without renewal.  There shall be no fee levied for the renewal of a special plate containing letters and/or numbers along with the inscription "Antique * * * Motorcyle Motorcycle-Mississippi." The fee * * *, less five percent (5%) thereof to be retained by the county tax collector, shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue on a monthly basis as prescribed by the commission.  The portion of the additional fee shall be retained by the tax collector * * * shall to be deposited into the county general fund. * * *  The portion of the fee remitted to the tax commission shall be deposited into the State Treasury on the day it is received and shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the State General Fund. (3)  For the purposes of this section, motorcycles manufactured more than twenty-five (25) years ago shall hereafter be classified as antique motorcycles and shall be exempt from all ad valorem taxes levied by both state, municipal, county and other taxing districts. SECTION 8.  Section 27-19-47.2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-47.2.  (1)  Any citizen of the State of Mississippi who owns a registered antique pickup truck may apply to the tax collector in the county of his legal residence, on forms prescribed by the Department of Revenue, for a special antique pickup truck plate to be displayed on such antique pickup truck. Upon receipt of an application for a special antique pickup truck plate, on a form prescribed by the department, and upon payment of the fee as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the tax collector shall issue to such applicant a special antique pickup truck plate on a permanent basis, and it shall bear no date, but shall bear the inscription "Antique Pickup Truck-Mississippi" and, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), shall be valid without renewal as long as the pickup truck is in existence.  Upon request by the applicant, the special antique pickup truck plate also may contain not more than six (6) letters of the alphabet and/or six (6) numbers along with the inscription "Antique Pickup Truck-Mississippi."  The purchaser of the special plate may choose the combination of such letters and/or numbers, but no two (2) pickup trucks shall have the same combination of letters and/or numbers.  In the event that the same combination of letters and/or numbers has been chosen by two (2) or more purchasers, the Department of Revenue shall assign a different number to each such purchaser which shall appear on the license plate following the combination of letters and/or numbers; however, this combination shall not exceed six (6) letters and/or numbers.  The combination of letters and/or numbers written across the license plate shall be sufficiently large to be easily read.  No combination of letters and/or numbers which comprise words or expressions that are considered obscene, slandering, insulting or vulgar in ordinary usage shall be permitted, with the Commissioner of Revenue having the responsibility of making this determination.  If, however, such license plate is issued in error or otherwise and is determined by the commissioner to be obscene, slanderous, insulting, vulgar or offensive, the commissioner shall notify the owner that the license plate must be surrendered and that another special antique pickup truck plate may be selected by him and issued at no cost.  Should the pickup truck owner not desire another special antique pickup truck plate, the fee for such plate shall be refunded.  In the event the owner fails to surrender the license plate after receiving proper notification, the commissioner shall issue an order directing that the license plate be seized by agents of the Department of Revenue or any other duly authorized law enforcement personnel.  In addition, a person issued a special antique pickup truck plate containing letters and/or numbers along with the inscription "Antique Pickup Truck-Mississippi" must renew the plate every fifth year after the plate was originally issued or renewed, as the case may be. This special plate shall be issued for the applicant's use only for such pickup truck and in the event of a transfer of title, the owner shall surrender the special plate to the tax collector. Such special antique pickup truck plate shall be issued in lieu of, and shall have the same legal significance as, ordinary registration plates. (2)  In lieu of the annual license tax and registration fees levied under Mississippi law, a special license tax fee shall be levied on the operation of antique pickup trucks.  The fee for a license shall be * * * Twenty‑five Dollars ($25.00) One Dollar and Twenty-five Cents ($1.25) and, except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section, it shall be issued on a permanent basis without renewal.  There shall be no fee levied for the renewal of a special plate containing letters and/or numbers along with the inscription "Antique Pickup Truck-Mississippi." The fee * * *, less five percent (5%) thereof to be retained by the county tax collector, shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue on a monthly basis as prescribed by the department.  The portion of the additional fee shall be retained by the tax collector * * * shall to be deposited into the county general fund. * * *  The portion of the fee remitted to the Department of Revenue shall be deposited into the State Treasury on the day it is received and shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the State General Fund. (3)  For the purposes of this section, pickup trucks manufactured more than twenty-five (25) years ago shall hereafter be classified as antique pickup trucks and shall be exempt from all ad valorem taxes levied by both state, municipal, county and other taxing districts. (4)  A person issued a special antique pickup truck plate under this section and who has completed an active duty career with the Armed Forces of the United States or is a retired member of the Army National Guard, Air National Guard or the United States Reserves, and is entitled to receive a distinctive license plate or tag under Section 27-19-51, may, upon application, receive an emblem or decal developed by the Department of Revenue identifying the person with such organization. The emblem or decal shall be affixed to the special antique pickup truck plate. SECTION 9.  Section 27-19-48, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-48.  (1)  (a)  Owners of motor vehicles and noncommercial trailers who are residents of this state, upon complying with the laws relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles and trailers, and upon payment of the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law for private carriers of passengers, pickup trucks, other noncommercial motor vehicles and trailers, and upon payment of an additional fee in the amount provided in subsection (4)(a) of this section, shall be issued a personalized license tag of the same color as regular license tags to consist of the name of the county and not more than seven (7) letters of the alphabet or seven (7) numbers in lieu of the license tag numbering system prescribed by law.  The purchaser of the personalized license tag may choose the combination of such letters or numbers, but no two (2) motor vehicles or trailers shall have the same combination of letters or numbers.  In the event that the same combination of letters has been chosen by two (2) or more purchasers, the Department of Revenue shall assign a different number to each such purchaser which shall appear on the license tag following the combination of letters; however, this combination shall not exceed seven (7) letters and/or numbers.  The combination of letters and/or numbers written across the license tag shall be sufficiently large to be easily read but shall not be less than three (3) inches in height. No combination of letters or numbers which comprise words or expressions that are considered obscene, slandering, insulting or vulgar in ordinary usage shall be permitted, with the Commissioner of Revenue having the responsibility of making this determination.  If, however, such license plate is issued in error or otherwise and is determined by the commissioner to be obscene, slanderous, insulting, vulgar or offensive, the commissioner shall notify the owner that the license plate must be surrendered and that another personalized license plate may be selected by him and issued at no cost. (b)  As an alternative to the personalized license tag being of the same color as regular license tags, an owner of a motor vehicle or noncommercial trailer may choose a personalized tag with a black background and a white pinstripe border. "Mississippi" shall be printed at the top, and the name of the county shall be printed at the bottom.  The application and the additional fee, less Two Dollars ($2.00) to be retained by the tax collector, shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue within seven (7) days of the date the application is made.  In all other respects, and except for the amount and distribution of the additional fee in subsection (4) of this section, tags issued under this paragraph (b) shall follow the guidelines for tags issued under paragraph (a) of this subsection. (c)  Should the vehicle or trailer owner not desire another personalized license plate, the fee for such plate shall be refunded.  In the event the owner fails to surrender the license plate after receiving proper notification, the commissioner shall issue an order directing that the license plate be seized by agents of the Department of Revenue or any other duly authorized law enforcement personnel. (2)  For the purposes of this section the terms "motor vehicle" and "vehicle" include motorcycles. (3)  Application for the personalized license tags shall be made to the county tax collector on forms prescribed by the Department of Revenue.  The application form shall contain space for the applicant to make five (5) different choices for the combination of the letters and numbers in the order in which the combination is desired by the applicant.  The application and the additional fee, less five percent (5%) thereof to be retained by the tax collector, shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue within seven (7) days of the date the application is made.  The portion of the additional fee retained by the tax collector shall be deposited into the county general fund. (4)  (a)  Beginning with any registration year commencing on or after November 1, 1986, any person applying for a personalized license tag shall pay an additional fee which shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees.  The additional fee paid shall be for a period of time to run concurrently with the vehicle's or trailer's established license tag year.  The additional fee of * * * Thirty Dollars ($30.00) Thirteen Dollars and Seventy-five Cents ($13.75) or, for alternative tags issued under subsection (1)(b) of this section, Fifty Dollars ($50.00) is due and payable at the time the original application is made for a personalized tag and thereafter annually at the time of renewal registration as long as the owner retains the personalized tag.  If the owner does not wish to retain the personalized tag, he must surrender it to the local county tax collector.  The additional fee due at the time of renewal registration shall be collected by the county tax collector and remitted to the Department of Revenue on a monthly basis as prescribed by the department. (b)  The Department of Revenue shall deposit all taxes and fees into the State Treasury on the day collected.  At the end of each month, the Department of Revenue shall certify the total fees collected under this section to the State Treasurer who shall distribute the fees as follows: (i)  For tags issued under subsection (1)(a) of this section, * * * Sixteen Dollars and Twenty‑five Cents ($16.25) of each additional fee shall be deposited to the credit of the State General Fund, and the remainder of each such additional fee shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. (ii)  For alternative tags issued under subsection (1)(b) of this section, Thirty-six Dollars and Twenty-five Cents ($36.25) of each additional fee shall be deposited to the credit of the Law Enforcement Officers and Fire Fighters Death Benefits Trust Fund established in Section 45-2-1, and the remainder of each such additional fee shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be expended solely for the repair, maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways. (5)  A regular license tag must be properly displayed as required by law until replaced by a personalized license tag; and the regular license tag must be surrendered to the tax collector upon issuance of the personalized license tag.  The tax collector shall issue up to two (2) license decals for the personalized license tag, which will expire the same month and year as the original license tag. (6)  The applicant shall receive a refund of the fee paid for a personalized license tag if the personalized license tag is not issued to him because the combination of letters and numbers requested to be placed thereon is not available for any reason. (7)  In the case of loss or theft of a personalized license tag, the owner may make application and affidavit for a replacement license tag as provided by Section 27-19-37.  The fee for a replacement personalized license tag shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00). The tax collector receiving such application and affidavit shall be entitled to retain and deposit into the county general fund five percent (5%) of the fee for such replacement license tag and the remainder shall be distributed in the same manner as funds from the sale of regular license tags. (8)  The owner of a personalized license tag may make application for a duplicate of such tag.  The fee for such duplicate personalized license tag shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00). The tax collector receiving the application shall be entitled to retain and deposit into the county general fund five percent (5%) of the fee for such duplicate personalized license tag and the remainder shall be distributed in the same manner as funds from the sale of regular license tags.  A duplicate personalized license tag may not be fastened to the rear of a vehicle or trailer and may not be utilized as a replacement for any personalized license tag issued pursuant to this section.  Month decals and year decals shall not be issued for duplicate personalized license tags and month decals and year decals shall not be attached to duplicate personalized license tags. SECTION 10.  Section 27-19-56.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.1.  (1)  Any owner of a motor vehicle who is a firefighter, including a career firefighter, a volunteer firefighter or an industrial firefighter, employed by or in the service of any municipality, county, fire district, state agency or industry in the state who is a resident of this state, or who is a retired firefighter who is a resident of this state, upon payment of the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law for private carriers of passengers, pickup trucks and other noncommercial motor vehicles, and upon payment of an additional fee in the amount provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall be issued a distinctive license tag for each motor vehicle registered in his name identifying such person as a firefighter or retired firefighter.  The distinctive license tags so issued shall be of such color and design as may be agreed upon by the Executive Committee of the Mississippi Fire Fighters Association and the Department of Revenue, shall consist of such letters or numbers, or both, as may be necessary to distinguish each license tag and may, in the discretion of the Department of Revenue, display the county name. (2)  Application for the distinctive license tags authorized by this section shall be made to the county tax collector on forms prescribed by the Department of Revenue. Applicants for such distinctive license tags (a) shall present to the issuing official proof of their employment or service as a firefighter by presentation of the applicant's official firefighter identification card or a signed and notarized affidavit from the governing authority or chief executive officer of the municipality, county, fire district, agency or industry by or for whom the applicant is employed or serves as a firefighter; or (b) shall present proof that they are a retired firefighter by presentation of a signed and notarized affidavit from the governing authority or chief executive officer of the municipality, county, fire district, agency or industry from whom the firefighter retired.  The application and the additional fee imposed under subsection (3) of this section, less three percent (3%) thereof to be retained by the tax collector, shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue on a monthly basis as prescribed by the department.  The portion of the additional fee retained by the tax collector shall be deposited into the county general fund. (3)  Beginning with any registration year commencing on or after July 1, 1992, any person applying for a distinctive license tag under this section shall pay an additional fee in the amount of * * * Fifty Dollars ($50.00) Forty-three Dollars ($43.00) for each distinctive license tag applied for under this section which shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees.  The additional fee paid shall be for a period of time to run concurrently with the vehicle's established license tag year.  The additional fee is due and payable at the time the original application is made for a distinctive license tag under this section and thereafter annually at the time of renewal registration as long as the owner retains the distinctive license tag.  If the owner does not wish to retain the distinctive license tag, or if the owner resigns from or otherwise vacates his employment or service as a firefighter, he must surrender it to the local county tax collector. (4)  The Department of Revenue shall deposit all fees into the State Treasury on the day collected.  At the end of each month, the Department of Revenue shall certify to the State Treasurer the total fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags. * * *  The State Treasurer shall distribute an amount equal to Seven Dollars ($7.00) of the additional fees collected for each such distinctive license tag issued under this section to the State General Fund, and the remainder of  Such additional fees collected shall be distributed by the State Treasurer to the Mississippi Fire Fighters Association. (5)  A regular license tag must be properly displayed as required by law until replaced by a distinctive license tag under this section.  The regular license tag must be surrendered to the tax collector upon issuance of the distinctive license tag under this section.  The tax collector shall issue up to two (2) license decals for each distinctive license tag issued under this section, which will expire the same month and year as the regular license tag. (6)  In the case of loss or theft of a distinctive license tag issued under this section, the owner may make application and affidavit for a replacement distinctive license tag as provided by Section 27-19-37, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The fee for a replacement distinctive license tag shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00). The tax collector receiving such application and affidavit shall be entitled to retain and deposit into the county general fund five percent (5%) of the fee for such replacement license tag and the remainder shall be distributed in the same manner as funds from the sale of regular distinctive license tags issued under this section. (7)  In lieu of the distinctive license tag authorized under subsections (1) through (6) of this section, any person who presents proof of his employment or service as a firefighter in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this section, may be issued a distinctive license tag decal for each motor vehicle registered in his name identifying such person as a firefighter.  The distinctive license tag decal shall be of such size, color and design as may be agreed upon by the Executive Committee of the Mississippi Fire Fighters Association and the department * * * of Revenue; however, the department * * * of Revenue shall have final approval of the size, color and design.  The distinctive license tag decals shall be prepared and sold at Two Dollars ($2.00) each through the Mississippi State Fire * * * Fighters Training Academy. SECTION 11.  Section 27-19-56.2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.2.  (1)  Any owner of a motor vehicle who is a duly sworn law enforcement officer employed by or in the service of the state, a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of the state, or who is a retired law enforcement officer who is a resident of this state, upon payment of the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law for private carriers of passengers, pickup trucks and other noncommercial motor vehicles, and upon payment of an additional fee in the amount provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall be issued a distinctive license tag for each motor vehicle registered in his name identifying such person as a law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer.  The distinctive license tags so issued shall be of such color and design as may be agreed upon by the Executive Committee of the Mississippi Law Enforcement * * * Officer's Officers' Association, the Legislative Committee of the Mississippi * * * Sheriff's Sheriffs' Association, the Executive Board of the * * * Police Chiefs Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police and the * * * State Tax Commission department.  The * * * State Tax Commission department shall have final approval of the color and design.  Each such distinctive license tag shall consist of such letters or numbers, or both, as may be necessary to distinguish each license tag and may, in the discretion of the * * * State Tax Commission department, display the county name. (2)  Application for the distinctive license tags authorized by this section shall be made to the county tax collector on forms prescribed by the * * * State Tax Commission department. Applicants for such distinctive license tags (a) shall present to the issuing official proof of their employment or service as a law enforcement officer by presentation of the applicant's official law enforcement officer's identification card or a signed and notarized affidavit from the governing authority or chief executive officer of the agency, county, municipality or political subdivision by or for whom the applicant is employed or serves as a law enforcement officer, or (b) shall present proof that they are a retired law enforcement officer by presentation of a signed and notarized affidavit from the governing authority or chief executive officer of the agency, county, municipality or political subdivision from whom the law enforcement officer retired.  The application and the additional fee imposed under subsection (3) of this section, less three percent (3%) thereof to be retained by the tax collector, shall be remitted to the * * * State Tax Commission department on a monthly basis as prescribed by the commission.  The portion of the additional fee retained by the tax collector shall be deposited into the county general fund. (3)  Beginning with any registration year commencing on or after July 1, 1992, any person applying for a distinctive license tag under this section shall pay an additional fee in the amount of * * * Fifty Dollars ($50.00) Forty-three Dollars ($43.00) for each distinctive license tag applied for under this section which shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees.  The additional fee paid shall be for a period of time to run concurrent with the vehicle's established license tag year.  The additional fee is due and payable at the time the original application is made for a distinctive license tag under this section and thereafter annually at the time of renewal registration as long as the owner retains the distinctive license tag.  If the owner does not wish to retain the distinctive license tag, or if the owner retires or resigns from or otherwise vacates his employment or service as a law enforcement officer, he must surrender it to the local county tax collector. (4)  The * * * State Tax Commission department shall deposit all fees into the State Treasury on the day collected.  At the end of each month, the * * * State Tax Commission department shall certify to the State Treasurer the total fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags. * * *  The State Treasurer shall distribute an amount equal to Seven Dollars ($7.00) of the additional fees collected for each such distinctive license tag issued under this section to the State General Fund, and the remainder of Such additional fees collected shall be distributed by the State Treasurer to the credit of the special fund created in Section 7-9-70. (5)  A regular license tag must be properly displayed as required by law until replaced by a distinctive license tag under this section.  The regular license tag must be surrendered to the tax collector upon issuance of the distinctive license tag under this section.  The tax collector shall issue up to two (2) license decals for each distinctive license tag issued under this section, which will expire the same month and year as the regular license tag. (6)  In the case of loss or theft of a distinctive license tag issued under this section, the owner may make application and affidavit for a replacement distinctive license tag as provided by Section 27-19-37, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The fee for a replacement distinctive license tag shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00).  The tax collector receiving such application and affidavit shall be entitled to retain and deposit into the county general fund five percent (5%) of the fee for such replacement license tag and the remainder shall be distributed in the same manner as funds from the sale of regular distinctive license tags issued under this section. SECTION 12.  Section 27-19-56.3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.3.  (1)  (a)  Any owner of a motor vehicle who is an elected member of the Mississippi House of Representatives or Mississippi Senate, upon complying with the motor vehicle laws relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles, upon payment of the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law for private carriers of passengers, pickup trucks and other noncommercial motor vehicles, and upon payment of an additional fee in the amount provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall be issued a distinctive license tag for each motor vehicle registered in his name.  Each distinctive license tag issued under this section shall have displayed thereon the Great Seal of the State of Mississippi and the word "HOUSE" or "SENATE," as appropriate, and, in addition thereto, such numbers or letters, or both, as may be necessary to distinguish each license tag.  The * * * State Tax Commission department shall determine the color and design of each distinctive license tag issued under this section and whether or not a county name shall be required to be displayed on the tag. (b)  Any owner of a motor vehicle who served at least two (2) complete four (4) year terms as an elected member of the Mississippi House of Representatives or Mississippi Senate, and who is receiving retirement compensation under the Public Employees' Retirement System created under Section 25-11-101, and/or the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan created under Section 25-11-301, upon complying with the motor vehicle laws relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles, upon payment of the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law for private carriers of passengers, pickup trucks and other noncommercial motor vehicles, and upon payment of an additional fee in the amount provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall be issued a distinctive license tag for each motor vehicle registered in his name.  Each distinctive license tag issued under this section shall have displayed thereon the Great Seal of the State of Mississippi and the words "RETIRED HOUSE" or "RETIRED SENATE," as appropriate, and, in addition thereto, such numbers or letters, or both, as may be necessary to distinguish each license tag.  The * * * State Tax Commission department shall determine the color and design of each distinctive license tag issued under this section and whether or not a county name shall be required to be displayed on the tag. (2)  Application for the distinctive license tags authorized by this section shall be made to the county tax collector on forms prescribed by the * * * State Tax Commission department.  The application and the additional fee imposed under subsection (3) of this section, less three percent (3%) thereof to be retained by the tax collector, shall be remitted to the * * * State Tax Commission department on a monthly basis as prescribed by the commission.  The portion of the additional fee retained by the tax collector shall be deposited into the county general fund. (3)  Any person applying for a distinctive license tag under this section shall pay an additional fee in the amount of * * * Fifty Dollars ($50.00) Forty-three Dollars ($43.00) for each distinctive license tag applied for under this section which shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees.  The additional fee paid shall be for a period of time to run concurrent with the vehicle's established license tag year.  The additional fee is due and payable at the time the original application is made for a distinctive license tag under this section and thereafter annually at the time of renewal registration as long as the owner retains the distinctive license tag.  If the owner does not wish to retain the distinctive license tag, or if the owner retires or resigns from or otherwise vacates his membership in the Legislature, he must surrender the tag to the local county tax collector. (4)  The * * * State Tax Commission department shall deposit all fees collected under this section into the State Treasury on the day collected.  At the end of each month, the * * * State Tax Commission department shall certify to the State Treasurer the total fees collected under this section from the issuance of distinctive license tags.  The State Treasurer shall distribute * * * an amount equal to Seven Dollars ($7.00) of the additional fees collected for each such distinctive license tag issued under this section * * * to the State General Fund, and the remainder of such additional fees collected shall be distributed by the State Treasurer to the credit of the special fund created in Section 7-9-70. (5)  A regular license tag must be properly displayed as required by law until replaced by a distinctive license tag under this section.  The regular license tag must be surrendered to the tax collector upon issuance of the distinctive license tag under this section.  The tax collector shall issue up to two (2) license decals for each distinctive license tag issued under this section, which will expire the same month and year as the regular license tag. (6)  In the case of loss or theft of a distinctive license tag issued under this section, the owner may make application and affidavit for a replacement distinctive license tag as provided by Section 27-19-37.  The fee for a replacement distinctive license tag shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00).  The tax collector receiving such application and affidavit shall be entitled to retain and deposit into the county general fund five percent (5%) of the fee for such replacement license tag and the remainder shall be distributed in the same manner as funds from the sale of regular distinctive license tags issued under this section. (7)  (a)  In addition to any other provisions of this section, any person eligible for a distinctive license tag under this section may, regardless of whether the person obtains such a license tag, obtain a replica tag of the distinctive license tag authorized in this section.  A replica tag may not be displayed on any motor vehicle and may not be used for any motor vehicle license tag purpose.  A person may obtain a replica tag from the Department of Revenue and the additional fee for the tag shall be the cost of the replica tag and any applicable shipping or delivery charge or other related charge incurred by the department. (b)  In addition to any other provisions of this section, any owner of a motor vehicle who served at least six (6) years as an elected member of the Mississippi House of Representatives or Mississippi Senate may obtain a replica tag of the distinctive license tag authorized in subsection (1)(a) of this section for which the person would be eligible to obtain if the person were serving as an elected member of the Mississippi House of Representatives or Mississippi Senate.  A replica tag may not be displayed on any motor vehicle and may not be used for any motor vehicle license tag purpose.  A person may obtain a replica tag from the Department of Revenue and the additional fee for the tag shall be the cost of the replica tag and any applicable shipping or delivery charge or other related charge incurred by the department. SECTION 13.  Section 27-19-56.5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.5.  (1)  (a)  In recognition of the patriotic service rendered by Mississippians who survived the attack on Pearl Harbor and by Mississippians who are recipients of the Purple Heart Medal, any such person is privileged to obtain two (2) distinctive motor vehicle license plates or tags identifying such person as a Pearl Harbor survivor or not more than five (5) distinctive motor vehicle license plates or tags and one (1) distinctive motorcycle license plate or tag identifying such person as a Purple Heart Medal recipient. (b)  A person who is privileged to obtain a distinctive motor vehicle license plate or tag identifying such person as a Purple Heart Medal recipient and who is eligible to obtain a special license plate under Section 27-19-56, is privileged to obtain one (1) distinctive motor vehicle license plate or tag bearing the International Symbol of Access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969 at its Eleventh World Congress on Rehabilitation of the disabled and identifying such person as a Purple Heart Medal recipient. (c)  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the distinctive plates or tags shall be of a color and design designated by the Department of Revenue. (2)  (a)  The distinctive license plates shall be prepared by the Department of Revenue and shall be issued through the tax collectors of the counties in the same manner as are other motor vehicle license plates or tags. * * *  (b)  A tag fee of Fifteen Dollars ($15.00), in addition to all other taxes and fees, shall be collected by the tax collector for the Pearl Harbor distinctive tag. ( * * *cb)  The first distinctive tag issued to Purple Heart Medal recipients under the provisions of this section shall be exempt from ad valorem taxes, privilege taxes and all other taxes and fees. There shall be no exemption from ad valorem taxes, privilege taxes or other taxes and fees for the issuance of an  additional distinctive tag to Purple Heart Medal recipients.  However, the surviving spouse of a deceased person who was issued a Purple Heart Medal distinctive license plate or tag under this section shall be entitled to apply for or retain one (1) such license tag and may continue annually to renew registration for such distinctive license plate or tag for as long as the spouse remains unmarried.  At the time of application or renewal registration, a surviving spouse who desires to retain such distinctive plate or tag shall file with the county tax collector a sworn statement that the spouse is unmarried, and any such vehicle when so registered shall be exempt from ad valorem taxes, privilege taxes and all other taxes and fees. * * *  (d)  The tax collector shall monthly forward the additional fee of Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) charged for issuance of a Pearl Harbor distinctive tag to the Department of Revenue which shall deposit such fee to the credit of the State General Fund. ( * * *ec)  An applicant for a distinctive tag under this section shall present to the issuing official either: (i)  Written proof that the applicant is an honorably discharged former member of one (1) of the Armed Forces of the United States and, while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States, was present during the attack on the Island of Oahu, Territory of Hawaii, on December 7, 1941, between the hours of 7:55 a.m. and 9:45 a.m., Hawaii time; or (ii)  Written proof that the applicant is a Purple Heart Medal recipient; however, if the person is applying for a distinctive tag pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the applicant shall also meet the requirements of Section 27-19-56. ( * * *fd)  The distinctive license plates or tags so issued shall be used only upon a personally or jointly owned private passenger vehicle (to include station wagons, recreational motor vehicles and pickup trucks) or motorcycle registered in the name, or jointly in the name, of the person making application therefor, and when issued to such person shall be used upon the vehicle for which issued in lieu of the standard license plate or license tag normally issued for such vehicle. (3)  The distinctive license plates shall not be transferable between motor vehicle owners; and in the event the owner of a vehicle bearing a distinctive plate shall sell, trade, exchange or otherwise dispose of the vehicle, such plate shall be retained by such owner and returned to the tax collector. (4)  A vehicle that displays a distinctive license plate issued under this section may park free of charge in any state parking space or state parking facility when the person to whom the license plate was issued is operating or occupying the vehicle. (5)  Any person evading or violating any of the provisions of this section, or attempting to secure benefits under this section to which he or she is not entitled, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned in the county jail for not less than six (6) months, or both. SECTION 14.  Section 27-19-56.6, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.6.  (1)  The owner of any street rod may apply to the tax collector in the county of his legal residence on an application prescribed therefor by the * * * State Tax Commission department, for a special street rod license plate to be displayed on his street rod. Upon receipt of an application for a street rod license plate, and upon payment of the fee as prescribed in this section, the tax collector shall issue to the applicant such special plate on a permanent basis, and it shall bear no date but shall bear the inscription "Street Rod-Mississippi" and shall be valid without renewal as long as the automobile is in existence.  This special plate shall be issued for the applicant's use only, and in the event of a transfer of title, the owner shall surrender the special plate to the tax collector. Such special plates shall be issued in lieu of, and shall have the same legal significance as, ordinary registration plates. In lieu of the annual license tax and registration fees, a special license tax fee shall be levied on the operation of street rods.  The fee for a license shall be * * * Fifty Dollars ($50.00) Two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($2.50), and it shall be issued on a permanent basis without renewal.  The fee * * *, less five percent (5%) thereof to be retained by the county tax collector, shall be remitted to the State Tax Commission on a monthly basis as prescribed by the commission.  The portion of the additional fee shall be retained by the tax collector * * * shall to be deposited into the county general fund. * * *  The portion of the fee remitted to the Tax Commission shall be deposited into the State Treasury on the day it is received and shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the State General Fund. (2)  For the purpose of this section, "street rod" shall mean any modified antique automobile or truck produced by an American manufacturer in 1948 or earlier which has undergone some type of modernizing, including modernization of the engine, transmission, drivetrain, interior refinements and any other modifications the builder desires, which vehicle is to be driven under its own power and is to be used as a safe, nonracing vehicle for family enjoyment. SECTION 15.  Section 27-19-56.11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.11.  (1)  Any resident of the State of Mississippi who is the owner of an antique automobile, as defined in Section 27-19-47, or a street rod, as defined in Section 27-19-56.6, upon payment of the fee provided for in subsection (2) of this section, may apply through the office of the tax collector in the county of his legal residence, on forms prescribed by the * * * State Tax Commission department, for permission to display on the vehicle an authentic historical license plate of the same year of issuance as the model year of the antique automobile or street rod.  The license plate shall be furnished by the applicant and presented for authentication to the * * * State Tax Commission department by the county tax collector. A regular license plate or a distinctive license plate authorized by law must be displayed on the vehicle until replaced by the historical license plate. (2)  In lieu of the annual payment of road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law, each person who applies for permission to display an historical license plate under this section, shall pay a one-time, nonrefundable special license tax fee of * * * Twenty‑five Dollars ($25.00) One Dollar and Twenty-five Cents ($1.25) to the county tax collector.  The fee * * *, less five percent (5%) thereof to shall be retained by the county tax collector * * * and to be deposited in the county general fund * * *, shall be remitted to the State Tax Commission on a monthly basis as prescribed by the commission and deposited in the State General Fund. (3)  Upon receipt of an application and an historical license plate under this section, the * * * State Tax Commission department shall examine the historical license plate to determine its authenticity, its condition and its original year of issue.  If the commission determines that the license plate is an authentic historical license plate of the same year of issuance as the model year of the antique automobile or street rod for which permission to display the license plate is applied and that the license plate is in satisfactory original condition or has been refurbished to a satisfactory condition, then it shall return the license plate to the tax collector with its approval.  If the commission determines that the license plate is not in satisfactory original condition or has not been refurbished to a satisfactory condition, then it shall return the license plate to the tax collector with its disapproval.  The county tax collector shall notify the applicant whether or not permission to display the license plate has been given by the * * * State Tax Commission department and, in either case, shall return the license plate to the applicant. (4)  An historical license plate that has been approved for display on an antique automobile or street rod under the provisions of this section, is not transferable between motor vehicle owners and may not be displayed on other motor vehicles owned by the same person.  If a person to whom permission has been granted to display an historical license plate no longer wishes to display the license plate on the vehicle for which permission was granted, or if such person sells, trades, exchanges or otherwise disposes of the vehicle, he must remove the license plate from such vehicle. SECTION 16.  Section 27-19-56.13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.13.  In recognition of the patriotic service rendered by Mississippians who are recipients of the Distinguished Flying Cross and the Air Medal, any such person is privileged to obtain one (1) distinctive motor vehicle license plate or tag identifying him as recipient of the Distinguished Flying Cross or the Air Medal.  The distinctive plates or tags shall be of a color and design designated by the * * * Tax Commission department. The distinctive license plates shall be prepared by the * * * Tax Commission department and shall be issued through the tax collectors of the counties in the same manner as are other motor vehicle license plates or tags. * * *  An additional tag fee of Thirty Dollars ($30.00) shall be collected by the tax collector for such license plates or tags and shall be forwarded to the State Tax Commission which shall deposit such fee to the credit of the State General Fund.  An applicant for such distinctive plates shall present to the issuing official written proof that the applicant is a recipient of the Distinguished Flying Cross or the Air Medal.  The distinctive license plates or tags so issued shall be used only upon a personally or jointly owned private passenger vehicle (to include station wagons, recreational motor vehicles and pickup trucks) registered in the name, or jointly in the name, of the person making application therefor, and when issued to such person shall be used upon the vehicle for which issued in lieu of the standard license plate or license tag normally issued for such vehicle. The distinctive license plates shall not be transferable between motor vehicle owners; and in the event the owner of a vehicle bearing a distinctive plate shall sell, trade, exchange or otherwise dispose of the vehicle, such plate shall be retained by such owner and returned to the tax collector. SECTION 17.  Section 27-19-56.467, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.467.  (1)  Any resident of the State of Mississippi who is the owner of an antique motorcycle, as defined in Section 27-19-47.1, upon payment of the fee provided for in subsection (2) of this section, may apply through the office of the tax collector in the county of his legal residence, on forms prescribed by the Department of Revenue, for permission to display on the motorcycle an authentic historical license plate of the same year of issuance as the model year of the antique motorcycle.  The license plate shall be furnished by the applicant and presented for authentication to the Department of Revenue by the county tax collector.  A regular license plate or a distinctive license plate authorized by law must be displayed on the motorcycle until replaced by the historical license plate. (2)  In lieu of the annual payment of road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees as prescribed by law, each person who applies for permission to display a historical license plate under this section, shall pay a one-time, nonrefundable special license tax fee of * * * Twenty‑five Dollars ($25.00) One Dollar and Twenty-five Cents ($1.25) to the county tax collector.  The fee * * *, less five percent (5%) thereof to shall be retained by the county tax collector * * * and to be deposited in the county general fund * * *, shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue on a monthly basis as prescribed by the department and deposited in the State General Fund. (3)  Upon receipt of an application and a historical license plate under this section, the Department of Revenue shall examine the historical license plate to determine its authenticity, its condition and its original year of issue.  If the department determines that the license plate is an authentic historical license plate of the same year of issuance as the model year of the antique motorcycle for which permission to display the license plate is applied and that the license plate is in satisfactory original condition or has been refurbished to a satisfactory condition, then it shall return the license plate to the tax collector with its approval.  If the department determines that the license plate is not in satisfactory original condition or has not been refurbished to a satisfactory condition, then it shall return the license plate to the tax collector with its disapproval.  The county tax collector shall notify the applicant whether or not permission to display the license plate has been given by the Department of Revenue and, in either case, shall return the license plate to the applicant. (4)  A historical license plate that has been approved for display on an antique motorcycle under the provisions of this section, is not transferable between motorcycle owners and may not 4e displayed on other motorcycles owned by the same person.  If a person to whom permission has been granted to display a historical license plate no longer wishes to display the license plate on the motorcycle for which permission was granted, or if such person sells, trades, exchanges or otherwise disposes of the motorcycle, he must remove the license plate from such motorcycle. SECTION 18.  Section 27-19-179, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-179.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Department of Revenue License Tag Acquisition Fund."  The special fund shall consist of monies deposited therein under Sections 27-19-99 and 27-19-155 and monies from any other source designated for deposit into the fund.  Any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  At the end of fiscal years 2022 * * * and each fiscal year thereafter through 2025, all unexpended amounts remaining in the fund above the sum of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) shall lapse into the State General Fund.  At the end of fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, all unexpended amounts remaining in the fund above the sum of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) shall lapse into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created in Section 27-51-105. (2)  From and after July 1, 2021, monies in the special fund may be used by the department * * * of Revenue for the purpose of paying the costs incurred for purchasing license tags and decals and associated freight costs under Section 27-19-1 et seq. SECTION 19.  Section 27-51-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-51-105.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund, into which shall be deposited the monies specified in Section 27-65-75(10), (11) and (12), such monies as may be required to be transferred into such fund pursuant to Sections 27-19-56.15, 27-19-56.24, 27-19-56.137, 27-19-99, 27-19-179 and 27-38-5, and such other monies as the Legislature may provide by appropriation.  The monies in the fund shall be used for the purpose of making payments to counties for the reduction in motor vehicle ad valorem tax revenues incurred by local taxing districts in the county as a result of the ad valorem tax credit for private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property that is provided for by Section 27-51-103. (2)  The Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund shall be administered by the * * * State Tax Commission department, and monies in the fund shall be expended upon appropriation by the Legislature. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of the state fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. SECTION 20.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after June 30, 2026.